Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1243
Bridge commission; dissolution.

Any local commission provided for in sections 14-1227 and 14-1244 may be dissolved by the governing body of the city at any time after the acquisition, construction, and equipment of the complete bridge or bridges within its care have been completed and all the costs thereof have been paid from the funds provided by the bond issues provided for in sections 14-1215 to 14-1217 and 14-1223. Thereupon the governing body of the city shall assume the further duties in connection with such bridge, including the operation, maintenance and repair thereof, the administration of funds, the collection of tolls, and all other necessary or proper acts. At any time thereafter it may create a new bridge commission to effect any of the purposes or objects authorized by sections 14-1201 to 14-1252.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 21, p. 628;

C.S.1929, § 14-1221;

R.S.1943, § 14-1243.